Florida, session 2026, HB1443.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 458.352, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1443 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1443, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
to read:
458.352 Parkinson's disease registry; reporting
requirement.—
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, each physician who
diagnoses or treats a patient for Parkinson's disease or
atypical parkinsonism shall report to the statewide Parkinson's
disease registry, established pursuant to s. 1004.4352,
information containing nationally recognized Parkinson's disease
and atypical parkinsonism performance measures.
(2) A liability of any kind or character for damages or
other relief may not arise or be enforced against a physician by
reason of having provided such information to the statewide
Parkinson's disease registry.
Section 2. Section 459.075, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
459.075 Parkinson's disease registry; reporting
requirement.—
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, each physician who
diagnoses or treats a patient for Parkinson's disease or
atypical parkinsonism shall report to the statewide Parkinson's
disease registry, established pursuant to s. 1004.4352,
information containing nationally recognized Parkinson's disease
and atypical parkinsonism performance measures.
(2) A liability of any kind or character for damages or
other relief may not arise or be enforced against a physician by
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1443 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1443, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
reason of having provided such information to the statewide
Parkinson's disease registry.
Section 3. Section 464.0124, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
464.0124 Parkinson's disease registry; advanced practice
registered nurse reporting requirement.—
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, each advanced practice
registered nurse who diagnoses or treats a patient for
Parkinson's disease or atypical parkinsonism shall report to the
statewide Parkinson's disease registry, established pursuant to
s. 1004.4352, information containing nationally recognized
Parkinson's disease and atypical parkinsonism performance
measures.
(2) A liability of any kind or character for damages or
other relief may not arise or be enforced against an advanced
practice registered nurse by reason of having provided such
information to the statewide Parkinson's disease registry.
Section 4. Paragraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (4) of
section 1004.4352, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection
(5) is added to that section, to read:
1004.4352 Parkinson's disease research.—
(4) CONSORTIUM FOR PARKINSON'S DISEASE RESEARCH.—
(b) The Parkinson's Disease Research Board is established
to direct the operations of the consortium. The board shall be
composed of one member appointed by the President of the Senate,
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1443 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1443, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
one member appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and members representing each participating
university or academic medical center, appointed by the
president or chief executive officer of each participating
university or academic medical center. Board members, other than
those appointed by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of
the House of Representatives, must have experience as a movement
disorder specialist and in informatics or population health
research and Parkinson's disease research in a variety of
scientific fields, including, but not limited to, neurology,
psychology, nutrition, and genetics. Members shall be appointed
to 3-year 4-year terms and may be reappointed to serve
additional terms. The chair shall be elected by the board from
among its members to serve a 2-year term. The board shall meet
at least semiannually at the call of the chair or, in his or her
absence or incapacity, the vice chair. Four members constitute a
quorum. A majority vote of the members present is required for
all actions of the board. The board may prescribe, amend, and
repeal a charter governing the manner in which it conducts its
business. Board members shall serve without compensation, but
are entitled to receive reimbursement for travel expenses by the
consortium or the organization he or she represents in
accordance with s. 112.061.
(e) By October 15 of each year, the board shall issue a
100 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1443 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1443, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 Speaker of the House of Representatives on research projects,
102 research findings, and community outreach initiatives conducted
103 or funded by, and future plans for the consortium. Beginning on
104 October 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, the report shall
105 include a summary update on the incidence and prevalence of
106 Parkinson's disease and atypical parkinsonism in the state by
107 county, how many records have been included and reported into
108 the registry, and demographic information such as patients by
109 age, gender, and race.
110 (5) PARKINSON'S DISEASE REGISTRY.—
111 (a) Subject to a specific appropriation, the Florida
112 Institute for Parkinson's Disease within the University of South
113 Florida shall establish and maintain a statewide Parkinson's
114 disease registry to ensure that the Parkinson's disease and
115 atypical parkinsonism performance measures required to be
116 submitted under paragraph (b) are maintained and available for
117 use to improve or modify the Parkinson's disease and atypical
118 parkinsonism care system, ensure compliance with standards and
119 nationally recognized guidelines, and monitor Parkinson's
120 disease and atypical parkinsonism patient outcomes.
121 (b) Physicians licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459,
122 pursuant to ss. 458.352 and 459.075, and advanced practice
123 registered nurses, pursuant to s. 464.0124, shall regularly
124 report to the statewide Parkinson's disease registry information
125 containing nationally recognized Parkinson's disease and
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1443 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1443, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
126 atypical parkinsonism performance measures.
127 (c) Beginning January 1, 2028, the Institute for
128 Parkinson's Disease within the University of South Florida shall
129 create and maintain a public website dedicated solely to the
130 Parkinson's disease registry which must include, at a minimum,
131 downloadable annual reports on the incidence and prevalence of
132 Parkinson's disease and atypical parkinsonism, information on
133 the consortium, and other information as determined by the
134 board. The website shall be updated on or before January 1,
135 2029, and annually thereafter.
136 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1443 -04-er